Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5803.15
Skilled nursing facility, defined.

Skilled nursing facility has the same meaning as in section 71-429.

Laws 1979, LB 172, § 24;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 71-5824;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 19;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 120.